dev/spellrelax.twol
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! The spellrelax.twol file is to implement things that should be analysed   !!
!! but not generated and that are not strictly orthographic errors, but      !!
!! more like alternative valid ways of spelling the same thing               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Alphabet

 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ӈ о п р с т у ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ӈ О П Р С Т У Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я

      ̄:̄
      ̄:̅
      ̄:0
   в:ф
   в:п
   и:ӣ
   у:ӯ
   у:y
   ӯ:ю̄
   у:ю̄
   у:ю
   ӈ:н
   х:һ
   с:х
   с:с
;

Sets

Vow = а е ё и о у ы э ю я 
      А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я ;

Rules

! Here we should list all of the vowel letters that have a precomposed 
! form in Unicode.

"Lengthened vowels"
Vx:Vy => _  : ; 
   where Vx in (  и  у  а  о  е  ю)
         Vy in (  ӣ  ӯ  ā  ō  ē  ю̄)
   matched ;

"нг to ӈ"
0:г => ӈ:н _ ;

!нуӈанӈин
!нунганнгин
!нунаннин
